Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2056.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Department of water resources; feasibility study; brackish groundwater desalination project sites; appropriation A. The department of water resources shall conduct a feasibility study of potential brackish groundwater desalination project sites in Ranegras Plain, Willcox, the Hualapai valley and the Little Colorado River plateau. B. The department of water resources shall consult with the state land department and local officials, property owners and political subdivisions located in or around each area listed in subsection A of this section to identify the following for each area: 1. The most probable and cost-effective potential sites to construct and operate a brackish groundwater recovery and treatment facility, including the most cost-effective potential points of withdrawal and accounting for factors such as land ownership, legal access, depth to water and hydrology. 2. The potential size, scope and cost of construction and operation of a brackish groundwater recovery and treatment facility, including identification of the most probable and cost-effective water treatment method. 3. The most probable, cost-effective and environmentally feasible use and plan for brine disposal, including the method and location of brine disposal. 4. The potential volume of potable water that a brackish groundwater recovery and treatment facility in the area could create and the identification of the most probable end user, including the expected cost and method of transportation to the most probable end user. C. The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of water resources for the study required by subsection A of this section.